Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 104 of Title 69, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Should railroads, excluding short lines, operating within
this state ever institute a policy requiring only a one-person crew
in the control compartment of the lead locomotive unit of a train,
then this section shall immediately become effective and require
said railroads to have a minimum of two crew members in the control
compartment of the lead locomotive unit of a train.
B. Compliance with subsection A of this section shall not be
required during switching operations, brake testing, safety
Req. No. 11706 Page 1

insp ections or while performing setouts in conjunction with road
service.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11706 JBH 12/16/24



















Req. No. 11706 Page 2